Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2701 to 81-2711 shall be known and may be cited as the State Government Effectiveness Act.

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 475, § 2.